Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NURSING FACILITY TEMPORARY RATE ADD-ON.new text end new text begin Effective July 1, 2025, the commissioner of human services shall provide a temporary rate add-on for nursing facilities reimbursed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256R, in an amount equal to $12.35 per resident day. The rate add-on under this section shall expire June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end